voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sab][Ny]nuoretta[Bm]karjatta:nuorettakarjatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]karjat:nuoretkarjat		Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]karja:nuoretkarja		Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sg][Nm]nuorien[Bm]karjoj:nuorienkarjoj		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sg][Nm]nuorten[Bm]karjoj:nuortenkarjoj		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sp][Nm]nuoria[Bm]karjoja:nuoriakarjoja		NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Ses][Nm]nuorina[Bm]karjoina:nuorinakarjoina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Str][Nm]nuoriksi[Bm]karjoiksi:nuoriksikarjoiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sine][Nm]nuorissa[Bm]karjoissa:nuorissakarjoissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sela][Nm]nuorista[Bm]karjoista:nuoristakarjoista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sill][Nm]nuoriin[Bm]karjoihi:nuoriinkarjoihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sade][Nm]nuorilla[Bm]karjoilla:nuorillakarjoilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sabl][Nm]nuorilta[Bm]karjoilta:nuoriltakarjoilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sall][Nm]nuorille[Bm]karjoille:nuorillekarjoille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sab][Nm]nuoritta[Bm]karjoitta:nuorittakarjoitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sko][Nm]nuorine[Bm]karjoine:nuorinekarjoine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorikarja[X][Sin][Nm]nuorin[Bm]karjoin:nuorinkarjoin		Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sn][Ny]nuori[Bm]mies:nuorimies	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sn][Ny]nuoren[Bm]miehe:nuorenmiehe       Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sg][Ny]nuoren[Bm]miehen:nuorenmiehen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sp][Ny]nuorta[Bm]miestä:nuortamiestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Ses][Ny]nuorena[Bm]miehenä:nuorenamiehenä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Str][Ny]nuoreksi[Bm]mieheksi:nuoreksimieheksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sine][Ny]nuoressa[Bm]miehessä:nuoressamiehessä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sela][Ny]nuoresta[Bm]miehestä:nuorestamiehestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sill][Ny]nuoreen[Bm]miehee:nuoreenmiehee	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sade][Ny]nuorella[Bm]miehellä:nuorellamiehellä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sabl][Ny]nuorelta[Bm]mieheltä:nuoreltamieheltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sall][Ny]nuorelle[Bm]miehelle:nuorellemiehelle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sab][Ny]nuoretta[Bm]miehettä:nuorettamiehettä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]miehet:nuoretmiehet		Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]miehe:nuoretmiehe		Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sg][Nm]nuorien[Bm]miehi:nuorienmiehi		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sg][Nm]nuorten[Bm]miest:nuortenmiest		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sp][Nm]nuoria[Bm]miehiä:nuoriamiehiä		NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Ses][Nm]nuorina[Bm]miehinä:nuorinamiehinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Str][Nm]nuoriksi[Bm]miehiksi:nuoriksimiehiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sine][Nm]nuorissa[Bm]miehissä:nuorissamiehissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sela][Nm]nuorista[Bm]miehistä:nuoristamiehistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sill][Nm]nuoriin[Bm]miehii:nuoriinmiehii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sade][Nm]nuorilla[Bm]miehillä:nuorillamiehillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sabl][Nm]nuorilta[Bm]miehiltä:nuoriltamiehiltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sall][Nm]nuorille[Bm]miehille:nuorillemiehille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sab][Nm]nuoritta[Bm]miehittä:nuorittamiehittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sko][Nm]nuorine[Bm]miehine:nuorinemiehine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X][Sin][Nm]nuorin[Bm]miehin:nuorinmiehin		Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sn][Ny]nuori[Bm]pari:nuoripari	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sn][Ny]nuoren[Bm]pari:nuorenpari       Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sg][Ny]nuoren[Bm]parin:nuorenparin	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sp][Ny]nuorta[Bm]paria:nuortaparia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Ses][Ny]nuorena[Bm]parina:nuorenaparina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Str][Ny]nuoreksi[Bm]pariksi:nuoreksipariksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sine][Ny]nuoressa[Bm]parissa:nuoressaparissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sela][Ny]nuoresta[Bm]parista:nuorestaparista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sill][Ny]nuoreen[Bm]parii:nuoreenparii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sade][Ny]nuorella[Bm]parilla:nuorellaparilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sabl][Ny]nuorelta[Bm]parilta:nuoreltaparilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sall][Ny]nuorelle[Bm]parille:nuorelleparille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sab][Ny]nuoretta[Bm]paritta:nuorettaparitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]parit:nuoretparit		Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sn][Nm]nuoret[Bm]pari:nuoretpari		Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sg][Nm]nuorien[Bm]pari:nuorienpari		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sg][Nm]nuorten[Bm]pari:nuortenpari		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sp][Nm]nuoria[Bm]pareja:nuoriapareja		NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Ses][Nm]nuorina[Bm]pareina:nuorinapareina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Str][Nm]nuoriksi[Bm]pareiksi:nuoriksipareiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sine][Nm]nuorissa[Bm]pareissa:nuorissapareissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sela][Nm]nuorista[Bm]pareista:nuoristapareista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sill][Nm]nuoriin[Bm]pareihi:nuoriinpareihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sade][Nm]nuorilla[Bm]pareilla:nuorillapareilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sabl][Nm]nuorilta[Bm]pareilta:nuoriltapareilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sall][Nm]nuorille[Bm]pareille:nuorillepareille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sab][Nm]nuoritta[Bm]pareitta:nuorittapareitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sko][Nm]nuorine[Bm]pareine:nuorinepareine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]nuoripari[X][Sin][Nm]nuorin[Bm]parein:nuorinparein		Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sn][Ny]oma[Bm]kuva:omakuva	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sn][Ny]oman[Bm]kuva:omankuva	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sg][Ny]oman[Bm]kuvan:omankuvan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sp][Ny]omaa[Bm]kuvaa:omaakuvaa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Ses][Ny]omana[Bm]kuvana:omanakuvana	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Str][Ny]omaksi[Bm]kuvaksi:omaksikuvaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sine][Ny]omassa[Bm]kuvassa:omassakuvassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sela][Ny]omasta[Bm]kuvasta:omastakuvasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sill][Ny]omaan[Bm]kuvaa:omaankuvaa	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sade][Ny]omalla[Bm]kuvalla:omallakuvalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sabl][Ny]omalta[Bm]kuvalta:omaltakuvalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sall][Ny]omalle[Bm]kuvalle:omallekuvalle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sab][Ny]omatta[Bm]kuvatta:omattakuvatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sn][Nm]omat[Bm]kuvat:omatkuvat	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sn][Nm]omat[Bm]kuva:omatkuva	Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sg][Nm]omien[Bm]kuvi:omienkuvi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sp][Nm]omia[Bm]kuvia:omiakuvia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Ses][Nm]omina[Bm]kuvina:ominakuvina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Str][Nm]omiksi[Bm]kuviksi:omiksikuviksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sine][Nm]omissa[Bm]kuvissa:omissakuvissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sela][Nm]omista[Bm]kuvista:omistakuvista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sill][Nm]omiin[Bm]kuvii:omiinkuvii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sade][Nm]omilla[Bm]kuvilla:omillakuvilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sabl][Nm]omilta[Bm]kuvilta:omiltakuvilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sall][Nm]omille[Bm]kuville:omillekuville	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sab][Nm]omitta[Bm]kuvitta:omittakuvitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sko][Nm]omine[Bm]kuvine:ominekuvine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omakuva[X][Sin][Nm]omin[Bm]kuvin:ominkuvin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sn][Ny]oma[Bm]tunto:omatunto	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sn][Ny]oman[Bm]tunto:omantunto	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sg][Ny]oman[Bm]tunnon:omantunnon	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sp][Ny]omaa[Bm]tuntoa:omaatuntoa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Ses][Ny]omana[Bm]tuntona:omanatuntona	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Str][Ny]omaksi[Bm]tunnoksi:omaksitunnoksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sine][Ny]omassa[Bm]tunnossa:omassatunnossa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sela][Ny]omasta[Bm]tunnosta:omastatunnosta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sill][Ny]omaan[Bm]tuntoo:omaantuntoo	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sade][Ny]omalla[Bm]tunnolla:omallatunnolla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sabl][Ny]omalta[Bm]tunnolta:omaltatunnolta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sall][Ny]omalle[Bm]tunnolle:omalletunnolle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sab][Ny]omatta[Bm]tunnotta:omattatunnotta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sn][Nm]omat[Bm]tunnot:omattunnot	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sn][Nm]omat[Bm]tunto:omattunto	Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sg][Nm]omien[Bm]tuntoj:omientuntoj	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sp][Nm]omia[Bm]tuntoja:omiatuntoja	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Ses][Nm]omina[Bm]tuntoina:ominatuntoina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Str][Nm]omiksi[Bm]tunnoiksi:omiksitunnoiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sine][Nm]omissa[Bm]tunnoissa:omissatunnoissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sela][Nm]omista[Bm]tunnoista:omistatunnoista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sill][Nm]omiin[Bm]tuntoihi:omiintuntoihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sade][Nm]omilla[Bm]tunnoilla:omillatunnoilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sabl][Nm]omilta[Bm]tunnoilta:omiltatunnoilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sall][Nm]omille[Bm]tunnoille:omilletunnoille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sab][Nm]omitta[Bm]tunnoitta:omittatunnoitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sko][Nm]omine[Bm]tuntoine:ominetuntoine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sin][Nm]omin[Bm]tunnoin:omintunnoin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X][Sg][Nm]oriid@D.YS_ALKANUT@:oriid@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X][Sp][Ny]oritta@D.YS_ALKANUT@:oritta@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X][Sp][Nm]oriita@D.YS_ALKANUT@:oriita@D.YS_ALKANUT@	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X]orii@D.YS_ALKANUT@:orii@D.YS_ALKANUT@	SisäpaikallissijatSsaSta_a	;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X]orii@D.YS_ALKANUT@:orii@D.YS_ALKANUT@	Ulkopaikallissijat_Yks_a	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sn][Ny]paha[Bm]henki:pahahenki	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sn][Ny]pahan[Bm]henke:pahanhenke	Omistusliite_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sg][Ny]pahan[Bm]hengen:pahanhengen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sp][Ny]pahaa[Bm]henkeä:pahaahenkeä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Ses][Ny]pahana[Bm]henkenä:pahanahenkenä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Str][Ny]pahaksi[Bm]hengeksi:pahaksihengeksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sine][Ny]pahassa[Bm]hengessä:pahassahengessä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sela][Ny]pahasta[Bm]hengestä:pahastahengestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sill][Ny]pahaan[Bm]henkee:pahaanhenkee	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sade][Ny]pahalla[Bm]hengellä:pahallahengellä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sabl][Ny]pahalta[Bm]hengeltä:pahaltahengeltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]pahahenki[X][Sall][Ny]pahalle[Bm]hengelle:pahallehengelle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
